Utah statutes.
78B-11-104.   Application.

(1)  This chapter applies to any agreement to arbitrate made on or after May 6, 2002.

(2)  This chapter applies to any agreement to arbitrate made before May 6, 2002, if all the parties to the agreement or to the arbitration proceeding agree on the record.

